Illinois, session 104th, HB5240.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Criminal Code of 2012 is amended by 5changing Section 12C-5 as follows: 6    (720 ILCS 5/12C-5)  (was 720 ILCS 5/12-21.6)7    Sec. 12C-5. Endangering the life or health of a child. 8    (a) A person commits endangering the life or health of a 9child when he or she knowingly: (1) causes or permits the life 10or health of a child under the age of 18 to be endangered; or 11(2) causes or permits a child to be placed in circumstances 12that endanger the child's life or health; or (3) leaves a child 13under 12 years of age unattended. It is not a violation of this 14Section for a person to relinquish a child in accordance with 15the Abandoned Newborn Infant Protection Act.16    (b) A trier of fact may infer that a child 6 years of age 17or younger is unattended if that child is left in a motor 18vehicle for more than 10 minutes.19    (c) "Unattended" means either: (i) not accompanied by a 20person 12 14 years of age or older; or (ii) if accompanied by a 21person 12 14 years of age or older, out of sight of that 22person.23    (d) Sentence. A violation of this Section is a Class A   HB5240- 2 -LRB104 19702 RLC 33151 b1misdemeanor. A second or subsequent violation of this Section 2is a Class 3 felony. A violation of this Section that is a 3proximate cause of the death of the child is a Class 3 felony 4for which a person, if sentenced to a term of imprisonment, 5shall be sentenced to a term of not less than 2 years and not 6more than 10 years. A parent, who is found to be in violation 7of this Section with respect to his or her child, may be 8sentenced to probation for this offense pursuant to Section 912C-15. 10(Source: P.A. 97-1109, eff. 1-1-13.)